Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 2 Historical Society Libraries

29-2-1.
Appropriations for Rhode Island Historical Society.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to be expended by the state librarian for the purpose of caring for, preserving, and cataloguing the property of the state in the keeping of the Rhode Island Historical Society, including such historical materials as may from time to time be transferred to the society from the state library collections by the state librarian, and for the purchase and binding of books relating to the history of the state, and for copying and preserving the records of the several towns of the state, and the state librarian, with the approval of the secretary of state, may pay this sum to the Rhode Island Historical Society for this purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 14; P.L. 1915, ch. 1207, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 17; P.L. 1929, ch. 1374, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1398, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

29-2-1

; P.L. 1978, ch. 404, § 2.

29-2-2.
Appropriations for Newport Historical Society.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to be expended by the state librarian for the purpose of caring for, preserving, and cataloguing the property of the state in the keeping of the Newport Historical Society, and for the purchase and binding of books relating to the history of the state, and for copying and preserving the records of the several towns of the state, and the state librarian, with the approval of the secretary of state, may pay this sum to the Newport Historical Society for this purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 14; P.L. 1915, ch. 1207, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 17; P.L. 1929, ch. 1374, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1398, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

29-2-2

.

29-2-3.
Disbursement of appropriated funds.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of these sums, or so much thereof as may be required, upon his or her receipt of proper vouchers approved by the state librarian and the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 36, § 17, as enacted by P.L. 1929, ch. 1374, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1398, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

29-2-3

.

29-2-4.
Use of historical society libraries.

All books, periodicals, and papers in the keeping of the Rhode Island Historical Society and the Newport Historical Society, shall at all reasonable times be open to the use of all the citizens of the state, under the same conditions pertaining to the members of the society as long as funds are provided under §§

29-2-1

,

29-2-2

, and

29-2-3

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 28, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

29-2-4

; P.L. 1978, ch. 404, § 2.

29-2-5.
Reports on expenditures.

The Rhode Island Historical Society and the Newport Historical Society, respectively, shall place on file with the state librarian annual reports as to the manner in which the funds are expended, as long as funds are appropriated in accordance with §§

29-2-1

,

29-2-2

, and

29-2-3

.

The Rhode Island Historical Society and the Newport Historical Society, respectively, shall submit to the general assembly and the state librarian annually a plan for the preservation initiatives for the collections in its care. The report shall be submitted as part of the annual report of each agency.

The Rhode Island Historical Society and the Newport Historical Society, respectively, shall submit to the state librarian a disaster preparedness plan for the collection in its care on or before January 1, 1993. The plan will be maintained on file at the state library and will be updated annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 862, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 15; G.L. 1929, ch. 36, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

29-2-5

; P.L. 1978, ch. 404, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 237, § 1.

29-2-6.
Appropriations for purchase, microfilming, and binding of newspapers.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary, to be expended by the state librarian for the purchase, microfilming, and binding of newspapers published in this state, the copies to be received by the state librarian and to be deposited in the Rhode Island Historical Society in accordance with §

29-2-4

, and the state controller is hereby authorized to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for this sum or sums, upon his or her receipt of vouchers approved by the state librarian and the secretary of state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 38, § 19; P.L. 1910, ch. 579, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2034, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 36, § 22; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 22, § 20; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

29-2-6

; P.L. 1978, ch. 404, § 2.